test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xosjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     хось+V+TV+Ger: хось
     хось+V+TV+GerFin: хованзь
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+Abs: хова
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+Abs: ховам’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+Abs: хова’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+Abs: хован’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+Abs: ховахана
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+Abs: ховахад
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+Abs: ховавна
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+Abs: ховаха’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+Abs: ховаха’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+Abs: ховаха’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+Abs: хова”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+Abs: хоби
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+Abs: хоби”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+Abs: ховаха”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+Abs: ховаха”на
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+Abs: ховахат
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+Abs: хоби”мана
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ховав, ховами]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: ховами
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ховав, ховами]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: ховами
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [хован, ховани]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: ховани
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ховахан, ховахани]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: ховахани
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ховаханан, ховаханани]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: ховаханани
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ховахадан, ховахадани, ховахадни]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ховахадани, ховахадни]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ховавнан, ховавнани]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: ховавнани
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ховахаюн, ховахаюни]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: ховахаюни
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ховахаюн, ховахаюни]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: ховахаюни
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ховахаюн, ховахаюни]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: ховахаюни
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [хобин, хобини]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: хобини
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [хобин, хобини]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: хобини
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [хоби”н, хоби”ни]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: хоби”ни
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [ховаха”н, ховаха”ни]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: ховаха”ни
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [ховаха”нан, ховаха”нани]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: ховаха”нани
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ховахатан, ховахатани, ховахатни]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ховахатани, ховахатни]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [хоби”манан, хоби”манани]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: хоби”манани
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ховар
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ховамд
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: хованд
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ховаханд
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ховахананд
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ховахаданд
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ховавнанд
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ховахаюд
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ховахаюд
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ховахают
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: хобид
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: хобид
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хобит
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ховахат
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ховаха”нат
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ховахатат
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хоби”манат
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ховада
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ховамда
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: хованда
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ховаханда
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ховахананда
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ховахаданда
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ховавнанда
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ховахаюда
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ховахаюда
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ховахаюта
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хобида
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хобида
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хобита
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ховахата
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ховаха”ната
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ховахатата, ховахатта]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хоби”маната
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ховами’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ховами’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ховани’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ховахани’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ховаханани’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ховахадани’, ховахадни’]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ховавнани’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ховахаюни’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ховахаюни’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ховахаюни’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хобини’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хобини’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хоби”ни’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ховаха”ни’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ховаха”нани’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ховахатани’, ховахатни’]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хоби”манани’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ховари’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ховамди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хованди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ховаханди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ховахананди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ховахаданди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ховавнанди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ховахаюди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ховахаюди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ховахаюти’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: хобиди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: хобиди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хобити’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ховахати’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ховаха”нати’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ховахатати’, ховахатти’]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хоби”манати’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ховади’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ховамди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хованди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ховаханди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ховахананди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ховахаданди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ховавнанди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ховахаюди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ховахаюди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ховахаюти’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: хобиди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: хобиди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хобити’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ховахати’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ховаха”нати’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ховахатати’, ховахатти’]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хоби”манати’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ховава”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ховава”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: хована”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ховахана”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ховаханана”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [ховахадана”, ховахадна”]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ховавнана”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ховахаюна”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ховахаюна”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ховахаюна”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хобина”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хобина”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хоби”на”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ховаха”на”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ховаха”нана”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ховахатана”, ховахатна”]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хоби”манана”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ховара”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ховамда”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хованда”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ховаханда”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ховахананда”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ховахаданда”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ховавнанда”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ховахаюда”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ховахаюда”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ховахаюта”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хобида”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хобида”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хобита”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ховахата”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ховаха”ната”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ховахатата”, ховахатта”]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хоби”маната”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ховадо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ховамдо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ховандо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ховахандо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ховаханандо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ховахадандо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ховавнандо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ховахаюдо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ховахаюдо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ховахаюто’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хобидо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хобидо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хобито’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ховахато’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ховаха”нато’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ховахатато’, ховахатто’]
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хоби”манато’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Abs: ховад
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ховадав, ховадув, ховадами]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: ховадами
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ховадав, ховадув, ховадами]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: ховадами
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [ховадан, ховадани]
#     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: ховадани
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ховадар
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ховадамд
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ховаданд
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: ховадада
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ховадамда
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ховаданда
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: ховадами’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: ховадами’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: ховадани’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: ховадари’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: ховадамди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: ховаданди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: ховадади’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: ховадамди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: ховаданди’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: ховадава”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: ховадава”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: ховадана”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: ховадара”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: ховадамда”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: ховаданда”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: ховададо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: ховадамдо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: ховадандо’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg1: ховадм’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg2: хован
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg3: хова
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu1: ховани’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu2: ховади’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu3: ховаха’
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl1: ховава”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl2: ховада”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl3: хова”
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg1: ховадамзь
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg2: хованась
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg3: ховась
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu1: хованинзь
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu2: ховадинзь
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu3: ховаханзь
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl1: ховаваць
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl2: ховадаць
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl3: ховаць
